Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1208
Grand jury and court sittings; attendance and duties.

Whenever the county attorney is required by the grand jury of any court sitting in his county, it shall be his duty to attend for the purpose of examining witnesses in their presence, or of giving them advice in any legal matter, and to issue subpoenas and other writs of process; to bring in witnesses and to draw up bills of indictment; but he shall not be present with the grand jury when an indictment is being considered and found by said grand jury.

Laws 1885, c. 40, § 10, p. 219;

R.S.1913, § 5603;

C.S.1922, § 4920;

C.S.1929, § 26-908;

R.S.1943, § 23-1208.